Hawaii statutes.
§612-59 Dismissal of indictment. Any
indictment which is based upon a grand jury proceeding in which a violation of
section 612-56, 612-57, or 612-58 has occurred may be subject to dismissal
without prejudice by an appropriate state court in the exercise of its
discretion. Motion for such dismissal may be made by either party or the
court. [L 1980, c 209, §10]

Case Notes

As applied to the facts of the case, the circuit court did
not abuse its discretion in finding that the grand jury counsel's statements
did not give rise to a tendency to prejudice and did not warrant dismissal of
the indictment, where statement that defendant's case was in the newspaper was
a fact already known to at least one juror, and statements regarding sex
offender registration were clarified so that it made clear that the grand jury
counsel was not stating a fact in defendant's case. 126 H. 40 (App.), 266 P.3d
448 (2011).

The standard in grand jury counsel misconduct should be the
authorized role and function of the grand jury counsel, that is, to advise the
grand jury on the law to be applied in making its probable cause determination;
thus, to warrant dismissal of an indictment, a defendant must show that the
grand jury counsel's misconduct has clearly infringed upon the grand jury's
decision-making function and invaded the province of the grand jury, and that
the misconduct tended to induce action other than that which reasonable grand
jurors, in their uninfluenced judgment, would deem warranted based on the
evidence fairly presented to them. 126 H. 40 (App.), 266 P.3d 448 (2011).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next